Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.430

Disparity in disposition of juvenile offenders—Data collection.

The administrative office of the courts shall collect such data as may be necessary to monitor any disparity in processing or disposing of cases involving juvenile offenders due to economic, gender, geographic, or racial factors that may result from implementation of section 1, chapter 373, Laws of 1993. The administrative office of the courts may, in consultation with juvenile courts, determine a format for the collection of such data and a schedule for the reporting of such data and shall keep a minimum of five years of data at any given time.

[ 2005 c 282 s 27; 2003 c 207 s 13; 1993 c 373 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1993 c 373: See note following RCW 13.40.020.